Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 86. Educational Television

§ 2801.
Gifts.

The trustees of the University of Vermont and State Agricultural College may accept any gift of money or real or personal property from any source whatever and grants in aid from the federal government to assist in carrying out the purposes of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1966, No. 23

(Sp. Sess.), § 4, eff. March 10, 1966.

§ 2802.
Construction.

The University of Vermont and State Agricultural College may acquire real estate; construct, operate, manage, and equip television broadcast stations and related auxiliary broadcast stations, including microwave facilities; and may interconnect with any other television station or network for the purpose of providing a statewide education television network for the transmission of programs to students in schools, colleges, and universities in Vermont, as well as to the public generally throughout the State; and may enter into any contract considered necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.
Title to the facilities created under this chapter shall be held in the name of the University of Vermont and State Agricultural College.

HISTORY:

Added

1966, No. 23

(Sp. Sess.), § 5, eff. March 10, 1966.

§ 2803.
Purposes.

The action of the University of Vermont and State Agricultural College in applying for construction permits and federal matching funds in connection with educational television in Vermont is expressly ratified and confirmed.
The University of Vermont and State Agricultural College may hold all necessary governmental authorizations for all facilities contemplated by this chapter, and shall take all acts necessary for the efficient and economical operation of those facilities according to good educational and engineering practices, all in accordance with applicable law, rules, and regulations.

HISTORY:

Added

1966, No. 23

(Sp. Sess.), § 6, eff. March 10, 1966.

§ 2804.
Repealed. 1981, No. 21.

§ 2805.
Repealed. 2011, No. 139 (Adj. Sess.), § 51(f)(3), eff. May 14, 2012.